District of Columbia statutes.
42-4072

Demolition

Expired.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 45-1571, 45-1572.

Editor's Notes

Expiration of subchapter: Section 907 of D.C. Law 3-131 (codified as former § 45-1597) provided that all subchapters of this chapter, except subchapter V, shall terminate on April 30, 1985.